Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1307.02
Unpaid wages; presumed abandoned; when.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by payroll checks owing in the ordinary course of the holder's business which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable, are presumed abandoned.

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 11.